Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,295
National System of Interstate and Defense Highways; Director-State Engineer; authorize weight limits.

Upon finding that no loss to the state of federal highway-user funds would result therefrom, the Director-State Engineer may authorize the carrying on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways of the weights set forth in the table of weights in section 60-6,294 or such part thereof as would result in no loss to the state of such funds.

Laws 1973, LB 463, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 39-722.02;

Laws 1980, LB 785, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 726, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,180.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 391.